District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2022

Sales in bulk.

Repealed.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 121, ch. 146, title I, § 142
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, §§ 210, 223, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254,§ 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(gg)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-2022.
1973 Ed., § 47-2619.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”